Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1692.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 25 O.S. 2021, Section 82.1, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 82.1. A. The designation and dates of holidays in
Oklahoma shall be as follows: Each Saturday, Sunday, New Year's Day
on the 1st day of January, Martin Luther King, Jr.'s Birthday on the
third Monday in January, Presidents' Day on the third Monday in
February, Memorial Day on the last Monday in May, Independence Day
on the 4th day of July, Labor Day on the first Monday in September,
the day upon which any General Election is held, Veterans' Day on
the 11th day of November, Thanksgiving Day on the fourth Thursday in
November, the day after Thanksgiving Day, Christmas on the 25th day
Req. No. 11766 Page 1

of D ecember, the day before or after Christmas if Christmas is not
on a Saturday or Sunday, the Thursday and Friday before Christmas if
Christmas is on a Saturday, the Monday and Tuesday after Christmas,
if Christmas is on a Sunday; and if any of such holidays other than
Christmas fall on Saturday, the preceding Friday shall be a holiday
in that year and if any of such holidays other than Christmas fall
on Sunday, the succeeding Monday shall be a holiday in that year.
B. The Governor shall issue an Executive Order each year
specifying the dates on which the holidays other than Saturdays and
Sundays designated in subsection A of this section occur. If the
President of the United States declares any day other than those
listed in subsection A of this section as a national holiday, the
Governor may issue an Executive Order declaring such day a state
holiday.
C. Any act authorized, required, or permitted to be performed
on a holiday as designated in subsection A of this section may be
performed on the next succeeding business day, and no liability or
loss of rights of any kind shall result from such delay.
D. State employees, except for temporary and other limited term
employees, shall be entitled to a day off work without loss of pay
on those holidays specified in an Executive Order issued by the
Governor pursuant to subsection B of this section. Those state
employees, except for temporary and other limited term employees,
who are required to work on a holiday specified in subsection B of
Req. No. 11766 Page 2

this section shall be entitled to a day off work, without loss of
pay, on an alternative date or payment in lieu thereof at the
discretion of the appointing authority and in accordance with rules
of the Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services.
E. For the purposes of this section, "holiday" means that
agencies whose mission does not require them to be open for business
every day of the year shall be closed for official business.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-11766 MAH 01/12/25














Req. No. 11766 Page 3